Washington statutes.
RCW 6.19.040

Justification of sureties.

If the adverse claimant posts a bond and the sheriff requires it, the sureties shall justify as in other cases, and in case they do not so justify when required, the sheriff shall retain the property; if the sheriff does not require the sureties to justify, he or she shall stand good for their sufficiency. The sheriff shall date and indorse acceptance upon the bond.

[ 1987 c 442 s 504; 1957 c 8 s 5; Code 1881 s 351; 1877 p 75 s 354; 1869 p 89 s 347; 1854 p 179 s 256; RRS s 574. Formerly RCW 6.20.020.]